Washington statutes.
RCW 41.28.230

Administrative expense.

The city council or city commission shall appropriate annually from the retirement fund the amount it deems necessary for the purpose of paying the expenses of administering the retirement system. The board of administration shall annually submit to the city council or city commission its estimate of the amount necessary to pay such expenses. The preliminary cost of establishment of said retirement system, such as clerical help and actuarial survey costs, etc., shall be paid by the department or departments affected.

[ 1939 c 207 s 24; RRS s 9592-124.]